Washington statutes.
RCW 38.14.024

Equipment and supplies.

The governor may obtain from the federal government such arms and other equipment and supplies as may be available for issue, donation or loan for the use of the Washington state guard. When such property is provided by the federal government, it will be utilized, maintained, and disposed of in accordance with federal requirements and with property rules and regulations promulgated under the provisions of RCW 38.08.090.

[ 1989 c 19 s 26.]